Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-313
Eminent domain; use of highways; construction and operation; general law applicable.

All general provisions of law applicable to electric light and power corporations and irrigation districts which pertain to the exercise of the power of eminent domain, the use and occupation of public highways, and the manner or method of construction and physical operation of plants, systems, and transmission lines shall be applicable, as nearly as may be, to irrigation districts in their exercise of the powers and functions, and in their performance of the duties conferred or imposed upon them under the provisions of sections 46-301 to 46-315.

Laws 1931, c. 91, § 13, p. 259;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 46-713;

R.S.1943, § 46-313.

For eminent domain procedure, see Chapter 76, article 7.